Massachusetts, session 194th, H5259.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Subsection (a) of section 2EEEEEE of chapter 29 of the General Laws, as 
inserted by chapter 214 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by inserting after the word 
“Matching” the following words:- , Fiscal Resilience.  
SECTION 2.   Subsection (d) of section 2EEEEEE, as so appearing, is hereby amended 
by striking out the words “and (iii)” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-  
(iii) protecting the commonwealth from the elimination, reduction, or material delay of 
federal funds upon a determination by the secretary that the elimination, reduction, or material 
delay of such federal funds would materially impact public health, safety or welfare, or the fiscal 
stability of the commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions, in accordance with guidance 
issued by the executive office for administration and finance; (iv) improving the financial 
stability of hospitals and community health centers in the commonwealth that provide health care 
to low-income, uninsured or underinsured residents, including by transferring any amounts in the 
fund to the Health Safety Net Trust Fund, in accordance with guidance issued by the executive 

of 4 14 office for administration and finance in consultation with the executive office of health and 
human services; (v) funding pay-as-you-go capital for any capital project or program up to the 
amount otherwise authorized by the General Court for such project or program in chapter 238 of 
the acts of 2024, in accordance with guidance issued by the executive office for administration 
and finance; and (vi)  
SECTION 3. Subsection (d) of said section 2EEEEEE, as so appearing, is hereby 
further amended by inserting after the word “Matching” the following word:- , Fiscal Resilience.  
SECTION 4. Subsection (e) of said section 2EEEEEE, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by inserting after the word “Matching” the following word:- , Fiscal Resilience.  
SECTION 5. Section 3 of chapter 214 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by striking 
out the figure “2026” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 2029.  
SECTION 6. Said section 3 of said chapter 214 of the acts of 2024 is hereby further 
amended by inserting after the word “Matching” the following word:- , Fiscal Resilience.  
SECTION 7. Section 4 of said chapter 214 of the acts of 2024 is hereby further amended 
by inserting after the word “Matching” the following word:- , Fiscal Resilience.  
SECTION 8. Said section 4 of chapter 214 of the acts of 2024 is hereby further amended 
by inserting after the figure “117-169” the following words:-   
and funding to organizations that hold tax-exempt status granted under section 501(c)(3) 
of the Internal Revenue Code, or are otherwise recognized as a tax-exempt charitable 
organization by the department of revenue that have experienced elimination, reduction, 

of 4 34 disruption or delay of federal funding, for purposes of protecting jobs, improving employment, 
and promoting opportunities, the economic vitality and the public health of the commonwealth.  
SECTION 9. Said section 4 of chapter 214 of the acts of 2024 is hereby further amended 
by inserting after the word “finance;” the following words:-   
provided, that not more than $200,000,000 may be expended from the Commonwealth 
Federal Matching and Debt Reduction Fund by the executive office for administration and 
finance, in consultation with the executive office of education, the executive office of labor and 
workforce development and the executive office of economic development, as a bridge funding 
reserve to support public institutions of higher education in the commonwealth to enable them to 
adapt to federal funding uncertainty, loss or diminishment of federal research funding, and to 
encourage advancement of scientific research, enhance employment opportunities and talent 
development, and to enable participation in partnerships and joint ventures related to research 
and innovation; provided further, that said amount may be used as flexible funding support for 
public institutions of higher education in the commonwealth to fund direct and indirect costs of 
research, to retain talent and preserve the pace of scientific discovery in the commonwealth; 
provided further, that said amount may be used as a talent retention and extension reserve to fund 
positions in research and teaching, including graduate, post doctorate and other early career 
research professionals that would otherwise be unfunded due to reductions in federal indirect 
rates, to build a bridge to future funding levels and sources; provided further, that said amount 
may be used to fund research opportunities, partnerships and joint ventures to support research 
activity, employment, and advance innovation and opportunity in the commonwealth including 
considerations of regional impact and geographic equity, including but not limited to 
opportunities related to advanced manufacturing and technology, agricultural science and 

of 4 57 technology, bioengineering and life sciences, civil engineering and advanced construction 
materials, climate and environmental science, ecology, education and child development, 
electronics, energy, fisheries and wildlife science and management, forestry science and 
management, marine science and technology, medical science and technology, meteorology and 
atmospheric science, nursing science, public health and applied health sciences, and robotics; 
provided further, that the executive office for administration and finance shall submit quarterly 
reports to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate and the house and senate 
committees on ways and means detailing expenditures under this clause and said sums shall be 
made available through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2028; provided further, that the executive 
office for administration and finance may transfer any funds available under this section 
necessary to carry out the purposes of this clause;   
SECTION 10. Section 4 of chapter 214 of the acts of 2024 is hereby further amended by 
striking out the figure “2026” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 2029.